Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201171-2048.01
Clinical privileges; standards
and procedures.

Any hospital required to be licensed under
the Health Care Facility Licensure Act shall not deny clinical privileges
to physicians and surgeons, podiatrists, osteopathic physicians, osteopathic
physicians and surgeons, certified
nurse midwives, licensed psychologists, or dentists solely by
reason of the credential held by the practitioner.
Each such hospital shall establish reasonable standards and procedures to
be applied when considering and acting upon an application for medical staff
membership and privileges. Once an application is determined to be complete
by the hospital and is verified in accordance with such standards and procedures,
the hospital shall notify the applicant of its initial recommendation regarding
membership and privileges within one hundred twenty days.

Laws 1989, LB 646, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 122;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 99;

Laws 2011, LB68, § 1.
August 27, 2011
Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.